Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2350.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 71A.20 RCW to read as follows:(1) Any time the department receives notice that a residential habilitation center is out of compliance with the centers for medicare and medicaid services conditions of participation or requirements, the secretary or the secretary's designee shall provide notice, in the manner described in subsection (2) of this section, within 10 days, of the following:(a) The initial statement of deficiencies or other determination of noncompliance, including the reason or reasons for the finding of noncompliance, and a plain language summary of the findings that explains the nature of the noncompliance and its potential impact on resident safety;(b) Establishment of any plan of correction for the facility; and(c) All subsequent determinations regarding the facility's return, or failure to return, to compliance, and any related enforcement action.(2) Notices as required in subsection (1) of this section must be:(a) Prominently posted at the relevant residential habilitation center until the violation is corrected to the satisfaction of the centers for medicare and medicaid services. The notices must be posted in a place or places in plain view of the residents of the residential habilitation center, persons visiting those residents, and any person who inquires about placement in the facility. Posted notices must be in English and all alternative languages that have been requested by residents of the relevant residential habitation center;(b) Provided in writing or email to individuals as indicated in RCW 71A.10.060 that are associated with residents of the relevant residential habilitation center. If individuals for which notice must be provided under this subsection (b) have indicated a preferred language other than English, notice must be provided in the preferred language; and(c) Emailed, or delivered by other electronic means, to the relevant committees of the legislature, within existing resources.--- END ---